Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,156
Nail technology school; student instructor limit.

No nail technology school shall at any time enroll more than two nail technology student instructors for each full-time nail technology instructor or cosmetology instructor actively working in and employed by the school.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 76;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,227;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 418;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 57.